District of Columbia statutes.
34-403

Chapters to be liberally construed; severability of provisions.

The provisions of this subtitle shall be interpreted and construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes thereof, and where any specific power or authority is given the Commission by the provisions of this subtitle the enumeration thereof shall not be held to exclude or impair any power or authority otherwise in this subtitle conferred on said Commission; provided, that the supply and sale of electricity shall not be regulated by the Commission except as expressly set forth in Chapter 15 of this title; provided further, that the supply and sale of natural gas by a licensed natural gas supplier shall not be regulated by the Commission except as expressly set forth in Chapter 16C of this title; provided further, that Internet Protocol-enabled Service, as defined in § 34-2001(7A), or Voice Over Internet Protocol-enabled Service, as defined in § 34-2001(23), shall not be regulated by the Commission. The Commission hereby created shall have, in addition to the powers in this subtitle specified, mentioned, and indicated all additional, implied, and incidental power which may be proper and necessary to effect and carry out, perform, and execute all the said powers herein specified, mentioned, and indicated. A substantial compliance with the requirements of this subtitle shall be sufficient to give effect to all the rules, orders, acts, and regulations of the Commission, and they shall not be declared inoperative, illegal, or void for any omission of a technical nature in respect thereto. That each section of this subtitle, and every part of each section, are hereby declared to be independent sections and the holding of any section or sections or part or parts thereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 993, ch. 150, § 8, par. 92
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(a), 47 DCR 1091
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 17(c), 51 DCR 10549
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-165, § 2, 55 DCR 5171
D.C. Law 17-165 inserted “; provided further, that Internet Protocol-enabled Service, as defined in § 34-2001(7A), or Voice Over Internet Protocol-enabled Service, as defined in § 34-2001(23), shall not be regulated by the Commission”.
D.C. Law 15-227, at the end of the first sentence, inserted “; provided further, that the supply and sale of natural gas by a licensed natural gas supplier shall not be regulated by the Commission except as expressly set forth in Chapter 16C of this title”.
D.C. Law 13-107 added the concluding proviso.
1973 Ed., § 43-1003.
1981 Ed., § 43-103.
Prosecution, see § 34-731.